Utah statutes.
78B-15-615.   Admission of paternity authorized.

(1)  A respondent in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may admit to the paternity of a child by filing a pleading to that effect or by admitting paternity under penalty of perjury when making an appearance or during a hearing.

(2)  If the tribunal finds that the admission of paternity satisfies the requirements of this section and finds that there is no reason to question the admission, the tribunal shall issue an order adjudicating the child to be the child of the man admitting paternity.

